California, session 20252026, SB841.
do enact as follows:SECTION 1. This act shall be known, and may be cited, as the Keep Safe Spaces Safe Act.SEC. 2. Section 17974.7 is added to the Health and Safety Code, to read:17974.7. (a) Except as required by state or federal law, or as required to administer a state or federally supported homeless shelter, an employee of a homeless shelter shall not, to the extent possible, allow access to the nonpublic areas of the site of a homeless shelter for immigration enforcement activity without a valid judicial warrant or court order. The director of the homeless shelter, or their designee, shall grant access if provided all of the following:(1) A valid identification.(2) A written statement of purpose.(3) A valid judicial warrant.(b) For the purposes of this section, “immigration enforcement” includes any and all efforts to investigate, enforce, or assist in the investigation or enforcement of any federal civil immigration law, and also includes any and all efforts to investigate, enforce, or assist in the investigation or enforcement of any federal criminal immigration law that penalizes a person’s presence in, entry, or reentry to, or employment in, the United States.SEC. 3. Section 13837.5 is added to the Penal Code, to read:13837.5. (a) Except as required by state or federal law, or as required to administer a state or federally supported rape crisis center, an employee of a rape crisis center shall not, to the extent possible, allow access to the nonpublic areas of the site of a rape crisis center for immigration enforcement activity without a valid judicial warrant or court order. The director of the rape crisis center, or their designee, shall grant access if provided all of the following:(1) A valid identification.(2) A written statement of purpose.(3) A valid judicial warrant.(b) For the purposes of this section, “immigration enforcement” includes any and all efforts to investigate, enforce, or assist in the investigation or enforcement of any federal civil immigration law, and also includes any and all efforts to investigate, enforce, or assist in the investigation or enforcement of any federal criminal immigration law that penalizes a person’s presence in, entry, or reentry to, or employment in, the United States.SEC. 4. Section 18296.5 is added to the Welfare and Institutions Code, to read:18296.5. (a) Except as required by state or federal law, or as required to administer a state or federally supported domestic violence shelter, an employee of a domestic violence shelter, family justice center, or human trafficking service provider shall not, to the extent possible, allow access to the nonpublic areas of the site of a domestic violence shelter, family justice center, or human trafficking service provider for immigration enforcement activity without a valid judicial warrant or court order. The director of the domestic violence shelter, family justice center, or human trafficking service provider, or their designee, shall grant access if provided all of the following:(1) A valid identification.(2) A written statement of purpose.(3) A valid judicial warrant.(b) For the purposes of this section, “immigration enforcement” includes any and all efforts to investigate, enforce, or assist in the investigation or enforcement of any federal civil immigration law, and also includes any and all efforts to investigate, enforce, or assist in the investigation or enforcement of any federal criminal immigration law that penalizes a person’s presence in, entry, or reentry to, or employment in, the United States.SEC. 5. The provisions of this act are severable. If any provision of this act or its application is held invalid, that invalidity shall not affect other provisions or applications that can be given effect without the invalid provision or application.SEC. 5.SEC. 6. No reimbursement is required by this act pursuant to Section 6 of Article XIII B of the California Constitution because the only costs that may be incurred by a local agency or school district will be incurred because this act creates a new crime or infraction, eliminates a crime or infraction, or changes the penalty for a crime or infraction, within the meaning of Section 17556 of the Government Code, or changes the definition of a crime within the meaning of Section 6 of Article XIII B of the California Constitution.___________________ REVISIONS: Heading—Line 5.___________________